vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions.foma
define CRH'LATN'PATTERNS'1(br) [
  [ {б} {у} {ю} {к} -> {büyük} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ъ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Б} {у} {ю} {к} -> {Büyük} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ъ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Б} {У} {Ю} {К} -> {BÜYÜK} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{Ъ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {б} {у} {ю} -> {büyü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{г}|{д}|{й}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ч}|{ш}|{c}] ] [ {и} ] ] .o.
  [ {Б} {у} {ю} -> {Büyü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{г}|{д}|{й}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ч}|{ш}|{c}] ] [ {и} ] ] .o.
  [ {Б} {У} {Ю} -> {BÜYÜ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{Г}|{Д}|{Й}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{C}] ] [ {И} ] ] .o.
  [ {б} {у} {ю} {т} -> {büyüt} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ы}|{а}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Б} {у} {ю} {т} -> {Büyüt} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ы}|{а}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Б} {У} {Ю} {Т} -> {BÜYÜT} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{Ы}|{А}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {д} {ж} {о} {н} {к} -> {cönk} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ъ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Д} {ж} {о} {н} {к} -> {Cönk} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{ъ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {Д} {Ж} {О} {Н} {К} -> {CÖNK} || [.#.|br] _ [ [\[{Ъ}]] ] ] .o.
  [ {коюм} @-> {köyüm} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Коюм} @-> {Köyüm} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КОЮМ} @-> {KÖYÜM} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {коюнъ} @-> {köyüñ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Коюнъ} @-> {Köyüñ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КОЮНЪ} @-> {KÖYÜÑ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {к} {о} {ю} {н} -> {köyün} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{д}|{и}] ] ] .o.
  [ {К} {о} {ю} {н} -> {Köyün} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{д}|{и}] ] ] .o.
  [ {К} {О} {Ю} {Н} -> {KÖYÜN} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{Д}|{И}] ] ] .o.
  [ {куе} @-> {küye} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Куе} @-> {Küye} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КУЕ} @-> {KÜYE} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {куркке} @-> {kürkke} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Куркке} @-> {Kürkke} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КУРККЕ} @-> {KÜRKKE} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {куркни} @-> {kürkni} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Куркни} @-> {Kürkni} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КУРКНИ} @-> {KÜRKNİ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {куркте} @-> {kürkte} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Куркте} @-> {Kürkte} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КУРКТЕ} @-> {KÜRKTE} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {куркчю} @-> {kürkçü} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Куркчю} @-> {Kürkçü} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КУРКЧЮ} @-> {KÜRKÇÜ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {кою} @-> {köyü} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Кою} @-> {Köyü} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КОЮ} @-> {KÖYÜ} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {жизнь} @-> {jizn} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Жизнь} @-> {Jizn} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {ЖИЗНЬ} @-> {JİZN} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {м} {у} -> {mü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{и}|{э}|{И}|{Э}] ] ] .o.
  [ {М} {у} -> {Mü} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{и}|{э}|{и}|{э}] ] ] .o.
  [ {М} {У} -> {MÜ} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{И}|{Э}|{И}|{Э}] ] ] .o.
  [ {ком-кок} @-> {köm-kök} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {Ком-кок} @-> {Köm-kök} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {КОМ-КОК} @-> {KÖM-KÖK} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {иаль} @-> {ial} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Иаль} @-> {İal} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ИАЛЬ} @-> {İAL} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {нуль} @-> {nul} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Нуль} @-> {Nul} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {НУЛЬ} @-> {NUL} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {кой} @-> {köy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Кой} @-> {Köy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙ} @-> {KÖY} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {койнинъ} @-> {köyniñ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Койнинъ} @-> {Köyniñ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙНИНЪ} @-> {KÖYNİÑ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {койни} @-> {köyni} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Койни} @-> {Köyni} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙНИ} @-> {KÖYNİ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {койге} @-> {köyge} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Койге} @-> {Köyge} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙГЕ} @-> {KÖYGE} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {койде} @-> {köyde} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Койде} @-> {Köyde} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙДЕ} @-> {KÖYDE} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {койдеки} @-> {köydeki} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Койдеки} @-> {Köydeki} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙДЕКИ} @-> {KÖYDEKİ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {койден} @-> {köyden} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Койден} @-> {Köyden} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЙДЕН} @-> {KÖYDEN} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {козь} @-> {köz} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Козь} @-> {Köz} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОЗЬ} @-> {KÖZ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-юнджи} @-> {-ünci} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ЮНДЖИ} @-> {-ÜNCİ} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-юнджиде} @-> {-üncide} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ЮНДЖИДЕ} @-> {-ÜNCİDE} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-юнджиден} @-> {-ünciden} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {-ЮНДЖИДЕН} @-> {-ÜNCİDEN} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {етсин} @-> {etsin} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Етсин} @-> {Etsin} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЕТСИН} @-> {ETSİN} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льная} @-> {lnaya} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Льная} @-> {Lnaya} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬНАЯ} @-> {LNAYA} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льное} @-> {lnoye} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Льное} @-> {Lnoye} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬНОЕ} @-> {LNOYE} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льный} @-> {lnıy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Льный} @-> {Lnıy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬНЫЙ} @-> {LNIY} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льний} @-> {lniy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Льний} @-> {Lniy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬНИЙ} @-> {LNİY} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льская} @-> {lskaya} || _ [br|.#.] ]
];
define CRH'LATN'PATTERNS'2(br) [
  [ {Льская} @-> {Lskaya} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬСКАЯ} @-> {LSKAYA} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льский} @-> {lskiy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Льский} @-> {Lskiy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬСКИЙ} @-> {LSKİY} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {льское} @-> {lskoye} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Льское} @-> {Lskoye} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЛЬСКОЕ} @-> {LSKOYE} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ополь} @-> {opol} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Ополь} @-> {Opol} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ОПОЛЬ} @-> {OPOL} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {щее} @-> {şçeye} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Щее} @-> {Şçeye} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЩЕЕ} @-> {ŞÇEYE} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {щий} @-> {şçiy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Щий} @-> {Şçiy} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЩИЙ} @-> {ŞÇİY} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {щая} @-> {şçaya} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Щая} @-> {Şçaya} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЩАЯ} @-> {ŞÇAYA} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {цепс} @-> {tseps} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Цепс} @-> {Tseps} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЦЕПС} @-> {TSEPS} || _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КъЮШ} @-> {QYŞ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЮШ} @-> {YŞ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {кок} @-> {kök} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Кок} @-> {Kök} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОК} @-> {KÖK} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ком-кок} @-> {köm-kök} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Ком-кок} @-> {Köm-kök} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОМ-КОК} @-> {KÖM-KÖK} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {коп} @-> {köp} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Коп} @-> {Köp} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КОП} @-> {KÖP} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {курк} @-> {kürk} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Курк} @-> {Kürk} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КУРК} @-> {KÜRK} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ог} @-> {ög} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Ог} @-> {Ög} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ОГ} @-> {ÖG} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {юрип} @-> {yürip} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Юрип} @-> {Yürip} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЮРИП} @-> {YÜRİP} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {юз} @-> {yüz} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Юз} @-> {Yüz} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЮЗ} @-> {YÜZ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {юк} @-> {yük} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Юк} @-> {Yük} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ЮК} @-> {YÜK} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {буюп} @-> {büyüp} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Буюп} @-> {Büyüp} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {БУЮП} @-> {BÜYÜP} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {буюк} @-> {büyük} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Буюк} @-> {Büyük} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {БУЮК} @-> {BÜYÜK} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {джонк} @-> {cönk} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Джонк} @-> {Cönk} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ДЖОНК} @-> {CÖNK} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {джонкю} @-> {cönkü} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Джонкю} @-> {Cönkü} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {ДЖОНКЮ} @-> {CÖNKÜ} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {устке} @-> {üstke} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Устке} @-> {Üstke} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {УСТКЕ} @-> {ÜSTKE} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {устте} @-> {üstte} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Устте} @-> {Üstte} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {УСТТЕ} @-> {ÜSTTE} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {усттен} @-> {üstten} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Усттен} @-> {Üstten} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {УСТТЕН} @-> {ÜSTTEN} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Я} @-> {Ya} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {Ё} @-> {Yo} || [.#.|br] _ [br|.#.] ] .o.
  [ {КъЮШн} @-> {QYŞn} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {ЮШн} @-> {YŞn} || [.#.|br] _ ] .o.
  [ {гъ} @-> {ğ} ] .o.
  [ [{Г} [{ъ}|{Ъ}]] @-> {Ğ} ] .o.
  [ {къ} @-> {q} ] .o.
  [ [{К} [{ъ}|{Ъ}]] @-> {Q} ] .o.
  [ {нъ} @-> {ñ} ] .o.
  [ [{Н} [{ъ}|{Ъ}]] @-> {Ñ} ] .o.
  [ {дж} @-> {c} ] .o.
  [ [{Д} [{ж}|{Ж}]] @-> {C} ] .o.
  [ {о} -> {ö} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {о} -> {ö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {О} -> {Ö} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {О} -> {Ö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {о} -> {ö} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {о} -> {ö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {О} -> {Ö} || [.#.|br] [ [{б}|{г}|{к}|{м}|{ш}|{c}|{Б}|{Г}|{К}|{М}|{Ш}|{C}] ] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
  [ {О} -> {Ö} || [.#.|br] _ [ [{б}|{в}|{г}|{д}|{ж}|{з}|{й}|{к}|{л}|{м}|{н}|{п}|{р}|{с}|{т}|{ф}|{х}|{ц}|{ч}|{ш}|{щ}|{c}|{ñ}|{Б}|{В}|{Г}|{Д}|{Ж}|{З}|{Й}|{К}|{Л}|{М}|{Н}|{П}|{Р}|{С}|{Т}|{Ф}|{Х}|{Ц}|{Ч}|{Ш}|{Щ}|{C}|{Ñ}] ] [ [{е}|{и}|{э}|{ю}|{ь}|{ü}|{Е}|{И}|{Э}|{Ю}|{Ь}|{Ü}] ] ] .o.
